dictsource/cv_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded
// Spelling-to-phoneme rules for Chuvash

.L02 е ӗ и ӳ э // front vowels
.L03 а ӑ у // back vowels
.L04 ю я // diphthongs

.group а
        а        a

.group ӑ
        ӑ        @

.group б
        б        b

.group в
        в        v

.group г
        г        g

.group д
        д        d

.group е
     _) е        je
        е        E

.group ё
        ё        jo

.group ӗ
        ӗ        8

.group ж
        ж        Z

.group з
        з        z

.group и
        и        i

.group й
        й        j

.group к
        к        k
		L02) к (L02	g
		L02_) к (L02	g
		L02) к (_L02	g
		L03) к (L03	Q
		L03_) к (L03	Q
		L03) к (_L03	Q
		L04) к (L02	g
		L04) к (L03	Q

.group л
        л        l

.group м
        м        m

.group н
        н        n

.group о
        о        o

.group п
        п        p
		L02) п (L02	b
		L02_) п (L02	b
		L02) п (_L02	b
		L03) п (L03	b
		L03_) п (L03	b
		L03) п (_L03	b
		L04) п (L02	b
		L04) п (L03	b

.group р
        р        R

.group с
        с        s
		L02) с (L02	z
		L02_) с (L02	z
		L02) с (_L02	z
		L03) с (L03	z
		L03_) с (L03	z
		L03) с (_L03	z
		L04) с (L02	z
		L04) с (L03	z

.group ҫ
        ҫ        C

.group т
        т        t
        ть        t;
		L02) т (L02	d
		L02_) т (L02	d
		L02) т (_L02	d
		L03) т (L03	d
		L03_) т (L03	d
		L03) т (_L03	d
		L04) т (L02	d
		L04) т (L03	d

.group у
        у        u

.group ӳ
        ӳ        y

.group ф
        ф        f

.group х
        х        x

.group ц
        ц        ts

.group ч
        ч        tS
		L02) ч (L02	dZ
		L02_) ч (L02	dZ
		L02) ч (_L02	dZ
		L03) ч (L03	dZ
		L03_) ч (L03	dZ
		L03) ч (_L03	dZ
		L04) ч (L02	dZ
		L04) ч (L03	dZ

.group ш
        ш        S
		L02) ш (L02	Z
		L02_) ш (L02	Z
		L02) ш (_L02	Z
		L03) ш (L03	Z
		L03_) ш (L03	Z
		L03) ш (_L03	Z
		L04) ш (L02	Z
		L04) ш (L03	Z

.group щ
        щ        C:

.group ъ
        ъ        ?

.group ы
        ы        V

.group ь
        ь        ;

.group э
        э        e

.group ю
        ю        ju
        
.group я
        я        ja 
